Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Patrol services, criminal
investigations, gaming
enforcement and office of
the State Fire Marshal ............. $177,511,323
(2) Fish and wildlife
enforcement .............................. $ 10,027,927
(3) Forensic services and
Chief Medical Examiner ............ $ 54,815,395
(4) Administrative services,
agency support and criminal
justice information services ...... $ 77,886,476
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 356,360
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State
Police, for the following purposes:
(1) Patrol services, criminal
investigations, gaming
enforcement and office of
the State Fire Marshal ............. $105,696,397
(2) Fish and wildlife
enforcement .............................. $ 30,833,219
(3) Forensic services and
Chief Medical Examiner ............ $ 934,343
(4) Administrative services,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 1
agency support and criminal
justice information services ...... $ 28,198,444
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 148,840
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Police for
the following purposes:
(1) Patrol services, criminal
investigations and office of
the State Fire Marshal ............. $ 2,528,212
(2) Fish and wildlife
enforcement .............................. $ 2,637,759
(3) Forensic services ...................... $ 2,700,804
(4) Administrative services,
agency support and criminal
justice information services ...... $ 4,773,090
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,073,617 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife enforcement activities.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 2